Montana, session 2025, HB517.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 69-12-314, MCA, is amended to read:
"69-12-314. Class D motor carrier certificate of public convenience and necessity. (1) Class D
carriers shall conduct operations pursuant to a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued by the
commission authorizing the transportation of the commodities described in 69-12-301(3). Class D carriers,
when applying for a new or additional certificate of public convenience and necessity, shall file an application
with the commission in accordance with the requirements of this chapter and the rules of the commission.
(2) A motor carrier may not possess a Class D motor carrier certificate of public convenience or
necessity or operate as a Class D motor carrier unless the motor carrier intends to engage or actually engages
in the transportation of garbage on a regular basis as part of the motor carrier's usual business operation."

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 517